Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5535XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5535XD (5) 91
da/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 9.21 Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Secretary” means the secretary of state.
2. “Waiver” means a military service filing fee waiver as
provided in this subchapter.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 9.22 Rules.
The secretary shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
necessary or desirable to administer this subchapter.
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 9.23 Military service filing fee
waiver —— general.
1. The secretary shall establish a military service filing
fee waiver.
2. The waiver shall apply to the fee for filing an eligible
document by an eligible filer on behalf of a qualified business
entity, if approved by the secretary, as provided in section
9.24.
3. The secretary may adopt rules providing for a routine
process to approve a waiver. The rules shall provide
procedures governing a request by a qualified business entity
to receive the waiver, the approval or rejection of that
request, and the qualified business entity’s receipt and use
of that waiver.
4. The waiver shall not apply to the fee for filing an
eligible document after the eligible document is filed.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 9.24 Qualifications of a business
entity —— eligibility of filer and document.
1. A business entity qualifies to receive a military
service filing fee waiver if the business entity is any of the
following:
a. A limited partnership forming or formed under chapter 488
or a foreign limited partnership applying to be or authorized
to transact business in this state under that chapter.
b. A limited liability company forming or formed under
chapter 489 or a foreign limited liability company registering
LSB 5535XD (5) 91
-1- da/jh 1/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
or registered to do business in this state under that chapter.
c. A domestic corporation forming or formed under chapter
490 or a foreign corporation registering or registered to do
business in this state under that chapter.
d. A domestic nonprofit corporation forming or formed under
chapter 504 or a foreign nonprofit corporation applying to
transact business in this state under that chapter.
2. An individual is qualified to sign for filing an eligible
document receiving a waiver on behalf of the qualified business
entity if the individual is all of the following:
a. An interest holder in the qualified business entity.
b. Any of the following:
(1) An officer or enlisted member serving in the armed
forces of the United States, including any component, part, or
corps of the armed forces of the United States, as described
in chapter 29A.
(2) An officer or enlisted member of the national guard or
organized reserves of the armed forces of the United States;
any regular, reserve, or auxiliary member of the United States
coast guard; or any member of the civil air patrol.
(3) A veteran as defined in section 35.1.
3. A document is eligible to receive a waiver only if the
document is named in the following:
a. Section 488.117A, subsection 5, for a limited partnership
or foreign limited partnership.
b. Section 489.122, subsection 3A, for a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company.
c. Section 490.122, subsection 4, for a domestic or foreign
corporation.
d. Section 504.113, subsection 4, for a nonprofit domestic
or foreign corporation.
4. The secretary by rule may provide for additional
requirements for the qualifications of a business entity, the
eligibility of a filer, or the eligibility of a document for
filing.
LSB 5535XD (5) 91
-2- da/jh 2/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 5. Section 488.117A, Code 2026, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. The secretary of state may impose,
assess, and collect a filing fee as a condition to accepting a
biennial report as provided in section 488.210.
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
limited partnership or foreign limited partnership filing as a
qualified business entity under chapter 9, subchapter III, may
request and shall receive a military service filing fee waiver
for an eligible document.
b. For purposes of paragraph “a”, an eligible document is
limited to any of the following:
(1) A certificate of limited partnership filed pursuant to
section 488.201.
(2) An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership
filed pursuant to section 488.202.
(3) A restatement of a certificate of limited partnership
filed pursuant to section 488.202.
(4) An application for a certificate of authority filed
pursuant to section 488.902.
Sec. 6. Section 489.122, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3A. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1,
a limited liability company or foreign limited liability
company filing as a qualified business entity under chapter
9, subchapter III, may request and shall receive a military
service filing fee waiver for an eligible document.
b. For purposes of paragraph “a”, an eligible document is
limited to any of the following:
(1) A certificate of organization filed pursuant to section
489.201.
(2) An amendment to a certificate of organization filed
pursuant to section 489.202.
(3) A restatement of a certificate of organization filed
pursuant to section 489.202.
LSB 5535XD (5) 91
-3- da/jh 3/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(4) A foreign registration statement filed pursuant to
section 489.903.
(5) An amendment of foreign registration statement filed
pursuant to section 489.904.
(6) A statement of conversion filed pursuant to section
489.1045.
(7) A statement of domestication filed pursuant to section
489.1055.
Sec. 7. Section 490.122, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
domestic or foreign corporation filing as a qualified business
entity under chapter 9, subchapter III, may request and shall
receive a military service filing fee waiver for an eligible
document.
b. For purposes of paragraph “a”, an eligible document is
limited to any of the following:
(1) Articles of incorporation filed pursuant to section
490.202.
(2) Articles of domestication filed pursuant to section
490.922.
(3) Articles of conversion filed pursuant to section
490.933.
(4) Articles of amendment filed pursuant to section
490.1006.
(5) Articles of restatement, with or without amendment,
filed pursuant to section 490.1007.
(6) A foreign registration statement filed pursuant to
section 490.1503.
(7) An amendment of foreign registration statement filed
pursuant to section 490.1504.
Sec. 8. Section 504.113, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
domestic or foreign corporation or foreign corporation filing
LSB 5535XD (5) 91
-4- da/jh 4/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
as a qualified business entity under chapter 9, subchapter III,
may request and shall receive a military service filing fee
waiver for an eligible document.
b. For purposes of paragraph “a”, an eligible document is
limited to any of the following:
(1) Articles of incorporation filed pursuant to section
504.202.
(2) An amendment to articles of incorporation filed
pursuant to section 504.1005.
(3) A restatement of articles of incorporation, with or
without amendment, filed pursuant to section 504.1006.
(4) An application for a certificate of authority filed
pursuant to section 504.1503.
(5) An amended certificate of authority filed pursuant to
section 504.1504.
Sec. 9. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed
to designate sections 9.21 through 9.24, as enacted in this
Act, as chapter 9, subchapter III.
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1,
2027.